Missouri, session 2026, SB1334.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 170.385, to read as
follows:
170.385. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Vulnerable Child Compassion and Protection
Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Biological sex", an individual's sex as assigned
at birth on his or her original birth certificate as
described in subsection 12 of this section, or, if the
individual's birth certificate is unobtainable, another
government record;
(2) "Gender identity", the preconceived notion of
someone's psychological, behavioral, social, and cultural
aspects of being a biological male or biological female.
For the purposes of this section, a biological male shall be
someone with the biological indicators of a male in the
context of reproductive potential or capacity, such as the
presence of a Y chromosome, naturally occurring sex

SB 1334 2
hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous external genitalia
present at birth. A biological female shall be someone with
the biological indicators of a female in the context of
reproductive potential or capacity, such as the absence of a
Y chromosome, naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and
nonambiguous internal and external genitalia present at
birth;
(3) "Parent", a parent or legal guardian of a
student. "Parents" means all of a student's parents or
legal guardians;
(4) "School", any public elementary or secondary
school or public charter school;
(5) "School official", any employee at a school,
including nurses, counselors, teachers, principals, and
other contracted personnel;
(6) "Sexual relationship", an individual's actual or
perceived emotional or physical attraction to, or romantic
or physical relationships with, members of the same
biological sex, members of a different biological sex, or
members of any biological sex; or the lack of any emotional
or physical attraction to, or romantic or physical
relationships with, anyone;
(7) "Student", any person who attends a public
elementary or secondary school or public charter school, is
under the age of eighteen, and is not an emancipated minor,
as such term defined in section 302.178.
3. (1) No school official shall encourage a student
to adopt a gender identity or sexual relationship.
(2) This subsection shall not apply to course
components of a school's curriculum that have artistic or
anthropological significance or to materials used in science

SB 1334 3
courses, including, but not limited to, materials used in
biology, anatomy, physiology, and sexual education classes.
4. If a student approaches a school official to
express discomfort or confusion about such student's
biological sex, the school official shall notify such
student's parents of the discussion within forty-eight hours.
5. No school official shall use a name to address a
student other than the name registered by such student's
parent during enrollment, or derivatives thereof, without
the written permission of such student's parents.
6. No school official shall use a pronoun to address a
student that differs from such student's biological sex
without the written permission of such student's parents.
7. No school official, when acting in the course of
his or her official duties, shall carry out any act or
communication that would violate subsections 4 to 6 of this
section.
8. No school shall require a school official to use a
pronoun that does not match a person's biological sex if
doing so would be contrary to the school official's
religious or moral convictions.
9. Nothing in this section prohibits school officials
from discussing any matters of public concern outside the
context of their official duties.
10. Any school official who discloses a violation of
this section by a school official shall be protected from
any manner of retaliation as set forth in section 105.055.
11. If a school district or charter school discovers
that a school official employed by such district or charter
school has knowingly violated any provision of this section,
the district or charter school shall determine a reasonable

SB 1334 4
and fair penalty for such violation in accordance with state
law.
12. For purposes of this section, a statement of an
individual's biological sex on his or her birth certificate
or another government record shall be deemed to have
correctly stated his or her biological sex only if the
statement was:
(1) Entered at or near the time of the individual's
birth; or
(2) Modified to correct any scrivener's error in the
individual's biological sex.
✓